zh-TW: 偏好土壤類型: 白堊土; 陶土; 壤土; 泥炭; 沙; 粉沙; 其他
sv: Föredragen jordtyp: Kritaktig; Lera; Lerig; Torvig; Sandig; Slattig; Övrigt
nb: Foretrukket jordtype: Kalkholdig; Leire; Leirholdig; Torvete; Sandet; Siltig; Annet
vi: Loại đất ưa thích: Có phấn; Đất sét; Đất mùn; Đất than bùn; Đất cát; Đất phù sa; Khác
it: Tipo di terreno preferito: Calcareo; Argilla; Argilloso; Torboso; Sabbioso; limoso; Altro
de: Bevorzugter Bodentyp: Kalkhaltig; Ton; Lehmig; Torfig; Sandig; Schlammig; Sonstiges
da: Foretrukken jordtype: Kridtholdig; Ler; Lerholdig; Tørvet; Sandet; Mudret; Andet
sk-SK: Preferovaný typ pôdy: Krieda; Hlina; Hlinitá; Rašelinová; Piesočnatá; Bahnitá; Iné
nl: Voorkeursgrondsoort: Kalkrijk; Klei; Leemachtig; Turfachtig; Zandig; Slibachtig; Overig
pl: Preferowany rodzaj gleby: Kredowe; Gliniane; Gleba gliniasta; Gleba torfowa; Gleba piaszczysta; Gleba pylasta; Inne
ru: Предпочтительный тип почвы: Известковая; Глинистая; Суглинистая; Торфяная; Песчаная; Илистая; Другая
cs: Preferovaný typ půdy: Vápenitá půda; Jílovitá půda; Hlinitá; Rašelinná; Písčitá; Siltová; Jiné
lt-LT: Pageidaujamas dirvožemio tipas: Kreidinė; Molio; Molinga; Durpinė; Smėlėta; Dumblėta; Kita
bg-BG: Предпочитан тип почва: Варовито; Глина; Глинеста; Торфена; Пясъчна; Тинеста; Друго
tr: Tercih edilen toprak tipi: Kireçli; Kil; Tınlı; Turbalı; Kumlu; Siltli; Diğer
sl-SI: Želena vrsta prsti: Kredast; Glina; Ilovnata; Šotna; Peščena; Muljasto; Druga
zh-CN: 优选土壤类型: 白垩土; 粘土; 壤土; 泥炭土; 砂土; 淤泥土; 其他
fi: Suositeltu maaperätyyppi: Kalkkinen; Savinen; Savinen; Turpeinen; Hiekkainen; Silttinen; Muu
ko: 선호 토양 유형: 초키; 클레이; 양토; 피트; 모래; 미사; 기타
ja: 好ましい土壌タイプ: 石灰質; 粘土質; ローム質; 泥炭; 砂質; シルト質; その他
pt-BR: Tipo de solo preferido: Calcário; Argila; Argiloso; Turfoso; Arenoso; Siltoso; Outro
el: Προτιμώμενος τύπος εδάφους: Ασβεστώδες; Αργιλώδες; Εύφορος; Όμοιος με φυτάνθρακα; Αμμώδης; Λασπώδες; Άλλο
hr-HR: Preferirana vrsta tla: Kredasto; Glina; Ilovača; Treset; Pijesak; Mulj; Ostalo
es: Tipo de suelo preferido: Calcárea; Arcilla; Margoso; Turboso; Arenoso; Limoso; Otros
pt-PT: Tipo de solo preferido: Calcário; Argila; Argiloso; Turfoso; Arenoso; Sedimentar; Outro
hu: Előnyben részesített talajtípus: Meszes; Agyag; Agyagos; Tőzeges; Homokos; Iszapos; Egyéb
th: ประเภทดินที่เหมาะสม: ผงชอล์ก; ดินเหนียว; ดินร่วนปนทราย; ดินที่มีปริมาณมูลอินทรีย์สูง; ดินที่มีอนุภาคทรายเป็นหลัก; ดินตะกอน; อื่นๆ
fr: Type de sol recommandé: Calcaire; Argile; Limoneux; Tourbeux; Sablonneux; Limoneux; Autre
ro-RO: Tipul de sol preferat: Calcaros; Argilos; Argilos; Turbă; Nisipos; Nămolos; Altele
en: Preferred soil type: Chalky; Clay; Loamy; Peaty; Sandy; Silty; Other